Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-409
Commission; salary and pay plans for employees; recommend.

The commission may recommend to the county board salary and pay plans for the employees.

Laws 1971, LB 921, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 23-2508;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 9.